Utah statutes.
63B-16-102.   Highway bonds -- Maximum amount -- Projects authorized.
(1) (a)  The total amount of bonds issued under this section may not exceed
$100,000,000.
(b)  When the Department of Transportation certifies to the commission the
amount of bond proceeds that it needs to provide funding for the highway
construction project described in Subsection (2) for the next fiscal year, the
commission may issue and sell general obligation bonds in an amount equal to
the certified amount plus costs of issuance.
(2) (a)  As used in this Subsection (2), "Mountain View Corridor" means the
land area of Salt Lake County running from Interstate 80 south between SR-154
and SR-111 to 12600 South and then south and southeasterly to the northern
portion of Utah County west of SR-15.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), proceeds from the issuance of bonds
shall be provided to the Department of Transportation to pay for the costs of
acquiring rights-of-way and constructing a highway construction project within
the Mountain View Corridor.
(c)  The Department of Transportation shall use bond proceeds to pay for the
portion of the highway construction project described in this Subsection (2)
that is located in Salt Lake County.
(d)  The costs under this Subsection (2) may include the cost of acquiring
land, interests in land, easements and rights-of-way, improving sites, and
making all improvements necessary, incidental, or convenient to the
facilities, interest estimated to accrue on these bonds during the period to
be covered by construction of the projects plus a period of six months after
the end of the construction period, interest estimated to accrue on any bond
anticipation notes issued under the authority of this title, and all related
engineering, architectural, and legal fees.
(3) (a)  Thirty million dollars of the bond proceeds issued under this section
shall be provided to the Department of Transportation and funds under
Subsection 72-2-121(4)(c) shall be used by the Department of Transportation to
pay for or to provide funds to a municipality or county to pay for the costs
of right-of-way acquisition, construction, reconstruction, renovations, or
improvements to highways described in Subsection (3)(b).
(b)  Bond proceeds described under Subsection (3)(a) and funds under
Subsection 72-2-121(4)(c) shall be used to pay the amounts described in this
Subsection (3)(b) for the following highways in Salt Lake County:
(i)  $6,500,000 to Taylorsville City for:
(A)  6200 South and Redwood Road intersection, interchange, and highway
improvements; and
(B)  an environmental study and preliminary engineering at 5400 South and
Interstate 215;
(ii)  $2,000,000 to West Valley City for 7200 West;
(iii)  $4,000,000 to West Jordan City for 7800 South and Airport Road
intersection and highway improvements;
(iv)  $6,250,000 to Sandy City for 1300 East, 9000 South to 11400 South, and
State Street to Interstate 15;
(v)  $1,500,000 to Riverton City for right-of-way acquisition between Mountain
View Corridor and Bangerter Highway north of 13400 South;
(vi)  $3,500,000 for highway, access, and other improvements for the new
commuter rail station in the south end of Salt Lake County;
(vii)  $11,000,000 to Draper City for the costs of highway improvements in the
Salt Lake County portion of Draper City;
(viii)  $1,000,000 to Murray City for highway improvements between Cottonwood
Street and 4500 South;
(ix)  $1,000,000 to Cottonwood Heights for Fort Union Boulevard between 1300
East and Highland Drive;
(x)  $1,000,000 to Midvale City for State Street between 7200 South and 9000
South; and
(xi)  $250,000 to Salt Lake County for 2300 East.
(c)  Prior to a municipality or county receiving funds described in this
Subsection (3), the municipality or county shall sign and file a written
certification with the department certifying that it will use the funds
provided under this Subsection (3) solely for the projects described in
Subsection (3)(b).
(4)  The commission or the state treasurer may make any statement of intent
relating to a reimbursement that is necessary or desirable to comply with
federal tax law.
(5)  The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements related to the
project before the receipt of proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter.
